Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.803

Exemption—Solicitation for legislative oral history account.

This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, or their designee from soliciting and accepting contributions to the legislative oral history account created in RCW 44.04.345.

[ 2008 c 222 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.